fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-1-wicihew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wîcihêw - ok : # VTA1 (VTA1 AEW) 

###PRS###
## INDEPENDENT ##
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwîcihin # LOCAL DIR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwîcihinâwâw

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwîcihitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwîcihitinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwîcihitinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwîcihitinâwâw


     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO:    niwîcihâw # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO:    kiwîcihâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO:    niwîcihânân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO:    kiwîcihânaw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO:    kiwîcihâwâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:    niwîcihâwak # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO:    kiwîcihâwak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:    niwîcihânânak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO:    kiwîcihânawak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO:    kiwîcihâwâwak

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimâwa # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimânâna
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimânawa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwâwa

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO:    niwîcihik # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO:    kiwîcihik
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1PlO:    niwîcihikonân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+21PlO:    kiwîcihikonaw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO:    kiwîcihikowâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO:    [niwîcihikowak, niwîcihikwak] # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO:    [kiwîcihikowak, kiwîcihikwak]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO:    niwîcihikonânak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+21PlO:    kiwîcihikonawak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO:    kiwîcihikowâwak

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimâwa # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    niwîcihimânâna
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimânawa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kiwîcihimâwâwa

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihêw # THIRD DIR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihêwak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihêyiwa
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihimêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihimêwak

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    [wîcihik, wîcihikow] # THIRD INV
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    [wîcihikowak, wîcihikwak]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihikoyiwa

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO:     niwîcihikawin # UNSPECIFIED ACTOR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO:     kiwîcihikawin
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO:     wîcihâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO:     niwîcihikawinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+21PlO:    [kiwîcihikawinaw, kiwîcihikawinânaw]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO:     kiwîcihikawinâwâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO:     wîcihâwak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO:  wîcihâyiwa

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO:     niwîcihikon # INANIMATE ACTOR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO:     kiwîcihikon
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO:     wîcihikow
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO:     niwîcihikonân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+21PlO:    [kiwîcihikonaw, kiwîcihikonânaw]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO:     kiwîcihikonâwâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO:     wîcihikowak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:  wîcihikoyiwa


## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wîcihiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wîcihiyêk

     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wîcihitân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wîcihitâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wîcihitâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wîcihitakok


     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO:    ê-wîcihak # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO:    ê-wîcihat
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO:    ê-wîcihâyâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+21Pl+3SgO:   ê-wîcihâyahk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO:    ê-wîcihâyêk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO:    ê-wîcihakik # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO:    ê-wîcihacik
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO:    ê-wîcihâyâhkik
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+21Pl+3PlO:   ê-wîcihâyahkok
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO:    ê-wîcihâyêkok

     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihimak # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihimat
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihimâyâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:   ê-wîcihimâyahk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihimâyêk

     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO:    ê-wîcihit # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO:    ê-wîcihisk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO:    ê-wîcihikoyâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+21PlO:   ê-wîcihikoyahk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO:    ê-wîcihikoyêk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO:    ê-wîcihicik # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO:    ê-wîcihiskik
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO:    ê-wîcihikoyâhkik
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+21PlO:   ê-wîcihikoyahkok
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO:    ê-wîcihikoyêkok

     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    ê-wîcihimit # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    ê-wîcihimisk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    ê-wîcihikoyâhk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:   ê-wîcihikoyahk
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    ê-wîcihikoyêk

     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihât # THIRD DIR
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihâcik
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihâyit
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihimât
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    ê-wîcihimâcik

     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    ê-wîcihikot # THIRD INV
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    ê-wîcihikocik
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihikoyit

## FUTURE CONDITIONAL ##
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Sg+1SgO:    wîcihiyani # LOCAL DIR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Sg+1PlO:    wîcihiyâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Pl+1PlO:    wîcihiyâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Pl+1SgO:    wîcihiyêko

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Sg+2SgO:    wîcihitâni # LOCAL INVERSE
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Pl+2SgO:    wîcihitâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Pl+2PlO:    wîcihitâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Sg+2PlO:    wîcihitako


     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Sg+3SgO:    wîcihaki # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Sg+3SgO:    wîcihaci
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Pl+3SgO:    wîcihâyâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+21Pl+3SgO:   [wîcihâyahko, wîcihâyahki]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Pl+3SgO:    wîcihâyêko
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Sg+3PlO:    wîcihakwâwi # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Sg+3PlO:    wîcihatwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Pl+3PlO:    wîcihâyâhkwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+21Pl+3PlO:   wîcihâyahkwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Pl+3PlO:    wîcihâyêkwâwi

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihimaki # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihimaci
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihimâyâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:   [wîcihimâyahko, wîcihimâyahki]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihimâyêko

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Sg+1SgO:    wîcihici # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Sg+2SgO:    wîcihiski
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Sg+1PlO:    wîcihikoyâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Sg+21PlO:   [wîcihikoyahko, wîcihikoyahki]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Sg+2PlO:    wîcihikoyêko
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Pl+1SgO:    wîcihitwâwi # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Pl+2SgO:    wîcihiskwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Pl+1PlO:    wîcihikoyâhkwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Pl+21PlO:   wîcihikoyahkwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Pl+2PlO:    wîcihikoyêkwâwi

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    wîcihimici # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    wîcihimiski
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    wîcihikoyâhki
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:   [wîcihikoyahko, wîcihikoyahki]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    wîcihikoyêko

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihâci # THIRD DIR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    wîcihâtwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihâyici
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihimâci
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    wîcihimâtwâwi

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    wîcihikoci # THIRD INV
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    wîcihikotwâwi
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikoyici

## IMPERATIVE ##
#LOCAL IMMEDIATE#
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:    wîcihin
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:    wîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:    wîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:    wîcihik
#LOCAL DELAYED#
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO:    wîcihîhkan
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO:    wîcihîhkâhk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO:    wîcihîhkâhk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO:    wîcihîhkêk

#MIXED IMMEDIATE#
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:    wîcih # Obj. Sg.
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:    wîcihihk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:    wîcihâtân

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:    wîcihik # Obj. Pl.
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:    wîcihihkok
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:    wîcihâtânik
#MIXED DELAYED#
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO:    wîcihâhkan # Obj. Sg.
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO:    wîcihâhkêk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+21Pl+3SgO:    wîcihâhkahk

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO:    wîcihâhkanik # Obj. Pl.
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO:    wîcihâhkêkok
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+21Pl+3PlO:    wîcihâhkahkok


###PRT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kikî-wîcihin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kikî-wîcihinân
     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kikî-wîcihinân
     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kikî-wîcihinâwâw

     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kikî-wîcihitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kikî-wîcihitinân
     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kikî-wîcihitinân
     PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kikî-wîcihitinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-kî-wîcihiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-kî-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-kî-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-kî-wîcihiyêk

     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-kî-wîcihitân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-kî-wîcihitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-kî-wîcihitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-kî-wîcihitakok


###FUT+INT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwî-wîcihin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwî-wîcihinân
     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwî-wîcihinân
     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwî-wîcihinâwâw

     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwî-wîcihitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwî-wîcihitinân
     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwî-wîcihitinân
     PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwî-wîcihitinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wî-wîcihiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wî-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wî-wîcihiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wî-wîcihiyêk
